Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.470

Retired health care provider liability malpractice insurance—Conditions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The department may establish by rule the conditions of participation in the liability insurance program by retired health care providers at clinics utilizing retired health care providers for the purposes of this section and RCW 43.70.460. These conditions shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The participating health care provider associated with the clinic shall hold a valid license to practice as a physician under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a naturopath under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW, an *advanced registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, or other health professionals as may be deemed in short supply by the department. All health care providers must be in conformity with current requirements for licensure, including continuing education requirements;

(2) Health care shall be limited to noninvasive procedures and shall not include obstetrical care. Noninvasive procedures include injections, suturing of minor lacerations, and incisions of boils or superficial abscesses. Primary dental care shall be limited to diagnosis, oral hygiene, restoration, and extractions and shall not include orthodontia, or other specialized care and treatment;

(3) The provision of liability insurance coverage shall not extend to acts outside the scope of rendering health care services pursuant to this section and RCW 43.70.460;

(4) The participating health care provider shall limit the provision of health care services to primarily low-income persons provided that clinics may, but are not required to, provide means tests for eligibility as a condition for obtaining health care services;

(5) The participating health care provider shall not accept compensation for providing health care services from patients served pursuant to this section and RCW 43.70.460, nor from clinics serving these patients. "Compensation" shall mean any remuneration of value to the participating health care provider for services provided by the health care provider, but shall not be construed to include any nominal copayments charged by the clinic, nor reimbursement of related expenses of a participating health care provider authorized by the clinic in advance of being incurred; and

(6) The use of mediation or arbitration for resolving questions of potential liability may be used, however any mediation or arbitration agreement format shall be expressed in terms clear enough for a person with a sixth grade level of education to understand, and on a form no longer than one page in length.

[2020 c 80 s 31; 2005 c 156 s 2; 2004 c 184 s 2; 1993 c 492 s 277; 1992 c 113 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Finding—1993 c 492: See note following RCW 28B.115.080.

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.

Legislative declaration—1992 c 113: See note following RCW 43.70.460.